District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

22-2907

Chapter supplemental to Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act.

Repealed.

Dec. 16, 1941, 55 Stat. 808, ch. 587, § 7
May 2, 2002, D.C. Law 14-116, § 8(f), 49 DCR 1945
Sex offender registration, “Anti-Sexual Abuse Act” defined, see § 22-4101.
1981 Ed., § 22-3422.
1973 Ed., § 22-3422.

Section 8(f) of D.C. Law 14-55 repealed §§ 22-2901 to 22-2907.

Section 10(b) of D.C. Law 14-55 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 8(f) of Food Regulation Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-128, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7939).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 8(f) of Food Regulation Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-147, October 23, 2001, 48 DCR 10183).